Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2224.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-6.2-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-6.2 entitled "2021 Act
on Climate" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-6.2-2. Purpose of the council.
(a) The council shall have the following duties:
(1) Assess, integrate, and coordinate climate change efforts throughout state agencies to
reduce emissions, strengthen the resilience of communities and infrastructure, and prepare for the
effects on climate change, including, but not limited to, coordinating vulnerability assessments
throughout state government;
(2)(i) No later than December 31, 2025, and every five (5) years thereafter, submit to the
governor and general assembly an updated plan, following an opportunity for public comment, that
includes strategies, programs, and actions to meet economy-wide enforceable targets for
greenhouse gas emissions reductions as follows:
(A) Ten percent (10%) below 1990 levels by 2020;
(B) Forty-five percent (45%) below 1990 levels by 2030;
(C) Eighty percent (80%) below 1990 levels by 2040;
(D) Net-zero emissions by 2050.
No action shall be brought pursuant to: subsection (a)(2)(i)(B) of this section before 2031,
pursuant to subsection (a)(2)(i)(C) of this section before 2041, and pursuant to subsection
(a)(2)(i)(D) of this section before 2051.

(ii) The plan shall also include procedures and public metrics for periodic measurement,
not less frequently than once every five (5) years, of progress necessary to meet these targets and
for evaluating the possibility of meeting higher targets through cost-effective measures.
(iii) The plan shall address in writing the annual input that is provided to the council by its
advisory board, as set forth in § 42-6.2-4, and its science and technical advisory board, as set forth
in § 42-6.2-5, in their reports to the council.
(iv) If a plan directs an agency to promulgate regulations, then the agency must do so by
either issuing an advance notice of proposed rulemaking, as set forth in § 42-35-2.5, no later than
six (6) months after the plan is released or by issuing a notice of proposed rulemaking, as set forth
in § 42-35-2.7, no later than one year after the plan is released, unless the plan specifies another
timeframe for an advance notice of rulemaking or a notice of rulemaking.
(v) The plan shall include an equitable transition to climate compliance for environmental
justice populations, redress past environmental and public health inequities, and include a process
where the interests of and people from populations most vulnerable to the effects of climate change
and at risk of pollution, displacement, energy burden, and cost influence such plan.
(vi) The plan shall identify support for workers during this equitable transition to address
inequity in the state by creating quality and family-sustaining clean energy jobs that pay wages and
benefits consistent with or that exceed area wage and labor standards. The plan shall provide for
the development of programs that directly recruit, train, and retain those underrepresented in the
workforce, including women, people of color, indigenous people, veterans, formerly incarcerated
people, and people living with disabilities.
(vii) The requirements under this subsection shall be subject to the enforcement provisions
of § 42-6.2-10 effective in 2026.
(viii) No later than December 31, 2022, the council shall submit to the governor and the
general assembly an update to the greenhouse gas emission’s reduction plan dated “December
2016” which shall not be subject to the requirements of subsections (a)(2)(ii) through (a)(2)(vi) of
this section. No action shall be brought pursuant to subsection (a)(2)(viii) of this section before
2023;
(3) Advance the state’s understanding of the effects on climate change including, but not
limited to: sea level rise; coastal and shoreline changes; severe weather events; critical
infrastructure vulnerability; food security; and ecosystem, economic, and health impacts, including
the effects of carbon pollution on children’s health;
(4) Identify strategies to prepare for these effects and communicate them to Rhode
Islanders, including strategies that incentivize businesses, institutions, and industry to adapt to
LC003306 - Page 2 of 4

climate change;
(5) Work with municipalities to support the development of sustainable and resilient
communities;
(6) Identify and leverage federal, state, and private funding opportunities for emission
reduction and climate change preparedness and adaption work in Rhode Island;
(7) Advise the governor, the general assembly, and the public on ways to ensure that Rhode
Island continues to be a national leader in developing and implementing strategies that effectively
address the challenges on climate change;
(8) Work with other New England states to explore areas of mutual interest to achieve
common goals; and
(9) Identify and facilitate opportunities to educate the public about climate change and
efforts throughout state agencies and municipalities to address climate change.; and
(10) Evaluate and make recommendations for the use of carbon emissions removal
technology as an alternative approach to reducing carbon emissions and meeting the climate goals
as set forth in this chapter.
(b) The council is encouraged to utilize the expertise of Rhode Island universities and
colleges in carrying out the duties described in subsection (a) of this section, specifically to ensure
that the state’s efforts to mitigate and adapt to climate change are based on the best available
scientific and technical information, and to optimize the contribution by the universities and
colleges of their expertise and experience in research, analysis, modeling, mapping, applications to
on-the-ground situations, technical assistance, community outreach, and public education.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003306
========
LC003306 - Page 3 of 4